New Jersey, session 221, A4476.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 10 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-24) is amended to read as follows: 10.  a.  [Upon] (1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 1 through 11 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-15 et seq.), upon motion of a prosecutor, when an eligible defendant is released from custody before trial pursuant to section 3 or 8 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17 or C.2A:162-22), the court, upon a finding that the eligible defendant while on release has violated a restraining order or condition of release, or upon a finding of probable cause to believe that the eligible defendant has committed a new crime while on release, may not revoke the eligible defendant's release and order that the eligible defendant be detained pending trial unless the court, after considering all relevant circumstances including but not limited to the nature and seriousness of the violation or criminal act committed, finds clear and convincing evidence that no monetary bail, non-monetary conditions of release or combination of monetary bail and conditions would reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, or that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process. (2)   Upon motion filed by a prosecutor pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the court may temporarily detain an eligible defendant, who has been arrested or otherwise taken into custody for an alleged violation of a restraining order or condition of release, or upon a finding of probable cause to believe that the eligible defendant has committed a new crime while on release. A risk assessment with recommendations on the conditions of release, prepared pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-25) for any new charge that forms the basis of one or more violations, shall be considered by the court in making the decision to revoke the eligible defendants release. (3)   When a motion is filed to revoke an eligible defendants release because the defendant was arrested on a complaint-warrant for a new crime or offense after the eligible defendant was released from custody before trial, pursuant to section 3 or section 8 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17 or C.2A:162-22), the Pretrial Services Program shall prepare a risk assessment with recommendations on the conditions of release, pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-25), for the new offense, and the court shall issue a pretrial release decision in accordance with the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-16) for a defendant who is temporarily detained pursuant to this subsection. b.    A court shall not revoke an eligible defendant's release and order that the eligible defendant be detained pending trial based on manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing, or possessing or having under control with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or possession of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10. (cf: P.L.2021, c.19, s.9) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.